Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1385
Commission proceeding; effect on employment; order; interest.

When an unresolved issue
proceeds to the commission, there shall be no change in the term or condition
of employment in effect in that issue or issues until the commission has ruled
and any subsequent appeal to the Supreme Court has been concluded. Orders
adjusting the term or condition of employment in an issue or issues shall
be effective beginning with final resolution of the appeal. Upon final resolution,
the commission or Supreme Court shall order increases or other changes in
a term or condition of employment to be concurrent with the biennial budget.
Interest shall be paid, at the rate established by section 45-103 which is
in effect at the time of the final order, by the state on all withheld wages
or insurance premium payments.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 151;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 30.